Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6135.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10ii. (1) By 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the commission shall establish large-load commercial rates for data centers. The rates must do all of the following: (a) Require that a data center enter into a contract with the utility for at least 15 years. (b) Require a minimum monthly billing charge for a data center that is based on not less than 60% of the data center's contracted demand and applies regardless of actual electricity consumption. (c) If the data center terminates service with the utility, require a fee to be charged to the data center equal to the monthly billing charge under subdivision (b) times the remaining months of the contract. (d) Require collateral equal to at least 24 months of the maximum monthly nonfuel billing charge. (e) Ensure that all generation, transmission, or distribution costs caused by the data center are paid by the data center and not existing electric utility customers. (2) As used in this section, "data center" means a facility in this state that is composed of 1 or more buildings and that is designed and intended for housing, and does house, data center equipment to centralize the storage and processing of data. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06934'26) or House Bill No. 6139 (request no. H06934'26). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06939'26) or House Bill No. 6137 (request no. H06939'26). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06942'26or House Bill No. 6140 (request no. H06942'26). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06943'26or House Bill No. 6142 (request no. H06943'26). (e) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06965'26) or House Bill No. 6138 (request no. H06965'26). (f) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S07181'26) or House Bill No. 6141 (request no. H07181'26).